District of Columbia statutes.
2-325.04

Repealed

Establishment of grading system for businesses contracting with the District.

Repealed.

Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-137, § 2, 55 DCR 1687
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(b), 58 DCR 1185